Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1047
911 service area, defined.

911 service area means (1) the portion of a local governing body's jurisdiction in which 911 service is provided and (2) an area being provided 911 service by contract with a service supplier on or before January 1, 1990, notwithstanding the crossing of jurisdictional lines, until such time as the noncontracting local governing body notifies the contracting local governing body in writing of its intention to opt out of the 911 service area.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 230;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-429;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 29.